Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.160

Alleged sexual misconduct by school employee—Parental notification—Information on public records act.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1296-S.SL) ***

School districts must, at the first opportunity but in all cases within forty-eight hours of receiving a report alleging sexual misconduct by a school employee, notify the parents of a student alleged to be the victim, target, or recipient of the misconduct. School districts shall provide parents with information regarding their rights under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, to request the public records regarding school employee discipline. This information shall be provided to all parents on an annual basis.

[ 2005 c 274 s 244; 2004 c 29 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2004 c 29: See note following RCW 28A.400.301.